Maryland, session 2026, SB0281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
10–205.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Governor
shall include an appropriation in the annual budget of at least the amount specified in
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0281*

SENATE BILL 281
paragraph (4) of this subsection for the sole purpose of providing grants to the Washington
Suburban Transit District to pay the capital costs of the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority.
(2) (i) The Governor is not required to make the appropriation under
paragraph (1) of this subsection in a fiscal year unless the Department certifies to the
Governor in writing before the beginning of the immediately preceding fiscal year that the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority has submitted to the Department:
1. Performance and condition assessments and reports
regarding:
A. The safety and reliability of rapid heavy rail and bus
systems;
B. The financial performance of the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority as it relates to rail and bus operations, including fare
box recovery, service per rider, and cost per service hour;
C. The monthly ridership of rail and bus systems broken
down by Metrorail station, Metrorail line, bus route, and bus line;
D. Strategies to reduce costs and improve the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority’s operational efficiency; and
E. The comparison of annual capital investments and
approved budgets; and
2. The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority’s:
A. Annual budget;
B. Annual independent financial audit;
C. Annual National Transit Database profile; and
D. Single audit reports issued in accordance with the
Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for
Federal Awards under 2 C.F.R. Part 200.
(ii) If the Commonwealth of Virginia or the District of Columbia
reduce the amount of dedicated capital funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority, the Governor may reduce the appropriation under paragraph (1) of this
subsection by a proportional amount.
(iii) 1. The Governor shall withhold 35% of the appropriation
under paragraph (1) of this subsection if:

SENATE BILL 281 3
A. The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority has
received a modified audit opinion as a result of an annual independent audit conducted in
accordance with Article XVI, Section 70 of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority Compact under § 10–204 of this subtitle; and
B. The Department has not certified to the Governor in
writing before the beginning of the immediately preceding fiscal year that the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority has submitted in writing to the board of directors of
the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and the Maryland General Assembly
a satisfactory corrective plan that addresses the reasons for the modified audit opinion.
2. The Governor shall release the portion of the
appropriation withheld under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph if the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority submits in writing to the board of directors of the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the Maryland General Assembly a satisfactory corrective action
plan that addresses the reasons for the modified audit opinion.
3. ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY
SHALL APPROVE A RAIL SIGNALING AND AUTOMATION WORKFORCE TRANSITION
PLAN, DEVELOPED IN CONSULTATION WITH AFFECTED COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
UNITS.
4. THE GOVERNOR SHALL WITHHOLD 35% OF THE
APPROPRIATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR ANY FISCAL
YEAR IN WHICH:
A. THE REQUIREMENT OF SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 3 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS NOT MET; OR
B. A RAIL OR BUS OPERATOR EMPLOYED BY THE
WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2028, IS TERMINATED DUE TO A REDUCTION IN FORCE CAUSED BY THE AUTOMATION
OF THE RAIL SYSTEM.
(3) The Governor shall make the appropriation under paragraph (1) of this
subsection from the Transportation Trust Fund.
(4) [(i)] For the first fiscal year in which the mandated appropriation
under this subsection applies, the appropriation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall equal at least the amount appropriated in the fiscal year 2019 State budget as enacted
for the Washington Suburban Transit District to pay the capital costs of the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

SENATE BILL 281
[(ii) For each fiscal year after the first fiscal year in which the
mandated appropriation under this subsection applies, the appropriation under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall be equal to the amount of the appropriation for the preceding
fiscal year increased by 3%.]
(g) (1) (I) The Governor shall include in the State budget an appropriation
for the purposes specified under [paragraph (2) of this subsection of $167,000,000]
PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION from the revenues available for the
State capital program in the Transportation Trust Fund.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, FROM THE REVENUES AVAILABLE FOR THE STATE CAPITAL
PROGRAM, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE STATE BUDGET AN
APPROPRIATION FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT AS ADJUSTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) The Department shall provide an annual grant of at least $167,000,000
to the Washington Suburban Transit District to be used only to pay the capital costs of the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.
(3) The [grant] GRANTS required under [paragraph (2)] PARAGRAPHS
(2) AND (4) of this subsection [is] ARE in addition to the appropriation required under
subsection (f)(1) of this section.
(4) (I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE AN ANNUAL GRANT OF AT LEAST
$150,000,000 ADJUSTED AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR THE STATE’S PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF THE METRORAIL
OPERATING SUBSIDY ALLOCATION FORMULA.
(II) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR AFTER FISCAL YEAR 2029, THE
APPROPRIATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF
THE APPROPRIATION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR INCREASED
BY 3%.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on:
(1) the Commonwealth of Virginia enacting legislation that provides
dedicated capital funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority that
includes:

SENATE BILL 281 5
(i) a mandatory appropriation for the Commonwealth of Virginia’s
proportionate share of the Metrorail Operating Subsidy Allocation Formula; and
(ii) an annual 3% increase to the mandatory appropriation; and
(2) the District of Columbia enacting legislation that provides dedicated
capital funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority that includes:
(i) a mandatory appropriation for the District of Columbia’s
proportionate share of the Metrorail Operating Subsidy Allocation Formula; and
(ii) an annual 3% increase to the base amount of capital funding.
(b) The Department of Transportation shall notify the Department of Legislative
Services in writing within 5 days after both the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District
of Columbia have enacted legislation that meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the date that the Department of
Legislative Services receives notice under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.